Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-413 Other loan programs. (a)
A credit union may loan to members under any government guaranteed or insured
loan program and such insurance on these loans shall be deemed adequate
security. The terms of such loans shall be as defined by the board of
directors under the provisions of the loan program.

(b) A credit union may purchase the
conditional sales contracts, notes and similar instruments of its members.

(c) A credit union may finance for any person
the sale of the credit union's personal property, including property obtained
as a result of defaults in obligations owed to the credit union, under the
terms, conditions and rates provided by this article. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next